California statutes. Water Code
In determining the amount of civil liability, the regional board, and the state board upon review of any order pursuant to Section 13320, shall take into consideration the nature, circumstance, extent, and gravity of the violation or violations, whether the discharge is susceptible to cleanup or abatement, the degree of toxicity of the discharge, and, with respect to the violator, the ability to pay, the effect on ability to continue in business, any voluntary cleanup efforts undertaken, any prior history of violations, the degree of culpability, economic benefit or savings, if any, resulting from the violation, and other matters as justice may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 869, Sec. 4.5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

13328.

After the time for judicial review under Section 13330 has expired, the state board may apply to the clerk of the appropriate court in the county in which the civil liability or penalty was imposed, for a judgment to collect the civil liability or penalty. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the state board or regional board action, constitutes a sufficient showing to warrant issuance of the judgment. The court clerk shall enter the judgment immediately in conformity with the application. The judgment so entered has the same force and effect as, and is subject to all the provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action, and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court in which it is entered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 420, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Judicial Review and Enforcement [13330. - 13331.]

13330.

(a) Not later than 30 days from the date of service of a copy of a decision or order issued by the state board under this division, other than a decision or order issued pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 13550) of Chapter 7, any aggrieved party may file with the superior court a petition for writ of mandate for review of the decision or order. An aggrieved party must file a petition for reconsideration with the state board to exhaust that party’s administrative remedies only if the initial decision or order is issued under authority delegated to an officer or employee of the state board and the state board by regulation has authorized a petition for reconsideration. The state board shall order or deny reconsideration on a petition
 therefor not later than 90 days from the date the state board adopts the decision or order.

(b) A party aggrieved by a final decision or order of a regional board subject to review under Section 13320 may obtain review of the decision or order of the regional board in the superior court by filing in the court a petition for writ of mandate not later than 30 days from the date on which the state board denies review.

(c) The time for filing an action or proceeding subject to Section 21167 of the Public Resources Code for a person who seeks review of the regional board’s decision or order under Section 13320, or who seeks reconsideration under a state board regulation authorizing a petition for reconsideration, shall commence upon the state board’s completion of that review or
 reconsideration.

(d) If no aggrieved party petitions for writ of mandate within the time provided by this section, a decision or order of the state board or a regional board shall not be subject to review by any court.

(e) Except as provided in this section, Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall govern proceedings for which petitions are filed pursuant to this section. For the purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the court shall exercise its independent judgment on the evidence in any case involving the judicial review of a decision or order of the state board issued under Section 13320, or a decision or order of a regional board for which the state board denies review under Section 13320, other than a decision or order issued
 under Section 13323.

(f) Except as provided in this section, no legal or equitable process shall issue in any proceeding in any court against the state board, a regional board, or any officer of the state board or a regional board to review, prevent, or enjoin any adjudicative proceeding under this division. Except as provided in this section and Section 13321, no legal or equitable process shall issue in any proceeding in any court against the state board, a regional board, or any officer or employee of the state board or a regional board to review, prevent, or enjoin a decision or order by the state board, a regional board, or any officer or employee of the state board or a regional board before a decision or order is issued and the procedures for administrative review of that decision or order have been exhausted.

(g) A party aggrieved by a decision or order issued by the state board under Article 7 (commencing with Section 13550) of Chapter 7 may petition for reconsideration or judicial review in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1120) of Part 1 of Division 2.

(h) For purposes of this section, a decision or order includes a final action in an adjudicative proceeding and an action subject to Section 11352 of the Government Code, but does not include an action subject to Section 11353 of the Government Code or the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 523, Sec. 3.   (AB 2446)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13331.

(a) Upon the failure of any person or persons to comply with any cease and desist order issued by a regional board or the state board, the Attorney General, upon request of the board, shall petition the superior court for the issuance of a preliminary or permanent injunction, or both, as may be appropriate, restraining such person or persons from continuing the discharge in violation of the cease and desist order.

(b) The court shall issue an order directing defendants to appear before the court at a time and place certain and show cause why the injunction should not be issued. The court may grant such prohibitory or mandatory relief as may be warranted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 659, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Summary Judicial Abatement [13340. - 13340.]

13340.

Whenever a regional board finds that a discharge of waste within its region is taking place or threatening to take place which does or will cause a condition of pollution or nuisance, constituting an emergency requiring immediate action to protect the public health, welfare, or safety, the Attorney General, upon request of the board, shall petition the superior court to enjoin such discharge. The court shall have jurisdiction to grant such prohibitory or mandatory injunctive relief as may be warranted by way of temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, and permanent injunction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Civil Monetary Remedies [13350. - 13351.]

13350.

(a) A person who (1) violates a cease and desist order or cleanup and abatement order hereafter issued, reissued, or amended by a regional board or the state board, or (2) in violation of a waste discharge requirement, waiver condition, certification, or other order or prohibition issued, reissued, or amended by a regional board or the state board, discharges waste, or causes or permits waste to be deposited where it is discharged, into the waters of the state, or (3) causes or permits any oil or any residuary product of petroleum to be deposited in or on any of the waters of the state, except in accordance with waste discharge requirements or other actions or provisions of this division, shall be liable civilly, and remedies may be proposed, in accordance with
 subdivision (d) or (e).

(b) (1) A person who, without regard to intent or negligence, causes or permits a hazardous substance to be discharged in or on any of the waters of the state, except in accordance with waste discharge requirements or other provisions of this division, shall be strictly liable civilly in accordance with subdivision (d) or (e).

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “discharge” includes only those discharges for which Section 13260 directs that a report of waste discharge shall be filed with the regional board.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “discharge” does not include an emission excluded from the applicability of Section 311 of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1321) pursuant to Environmental Protection Agency regulations interpreting Section
 311(a)(2) of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1321(a)(2)).

(c) A person shall not be liable under subdivision (b) if the discharge is caused solely by any one or combination of the following:

(1) An act of war.

(2) An unanticipated grave natural disaster or other natural phenomenon of an exceptional, inevitable, and irresistible character, the effects of which could not have been prevented or avoided by the exercise of due care or foresight.

(3) Negligence on the part of the state, the United States, or any department or agency thereof. However, this paragraph shall not be interpreted to provide the state, the United States, or any department or agency thereof a defense to liability for any discharge caused by its own negligence.

(4) An intentional act of a third party, the effects of which could not have been prevented or avoided by the exercise of due care or foresight.

(5) Any other circumstance or event that causes the discharge despite the exercise of every reasonable precaution to prevent or mitigate the discharge.

(d) The court may impose civil liability either on a daily basis or on a per gallon basis, but not on both.

(1) The civil liability on a daily basis shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each day the violation occurs.

(2) The civil liability on a per gallon basis shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20) for each gallon of waste discharged.

(e) The state board or a regional board may impose civil liability administratively pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5 either on a daily basis or on a per gallon basis, but not on both.

(1) The civil liability on a daily basis shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day the violation occurs.

(A) When there is a discharge, and a cleanup and abatement order is issued, except as provided in subdivision (f), the civil liability shall not be less than five hundred dollars ($500) for each day in which the discharge occurs and for each day the cleanup and abatement order is violated.

(B) When there is no discharge, but an order issued by the regional board is violated, except as provided in subdivision (f), the
 civil liability shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(2) The civil liability on a per gallon basis shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) for each gallon of waste discharged.

(f) A regional board shall not administratively impose civil liability in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) in an amount less than the minimum amount specified, unless the regional board makes express findings setting forth the reasons for its action based upon the specific factors required to be considered pursuant to Section 13327.

(g) The Attorney General, upon request of a regional board or the state board, shall petition the superior court to impose, assess, and recover the sums. Except in the case of a violation of a cease and desist order, a regional board or the state
 board shall make the request only after a hearing, with due notice of the hearing given to all affected persons. In determining the amount to be imposed, assessed, or recovered, the court shall be subject to Section 13351.

(h) Article 3 (commencing with Section 13330) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 13360) apply to proceedings to impose, assess, and recover an amount pursuant to this article.

(i) A person who incurs any liability established under this section shall be entitled to contribution for that liability from a third party, in an action in the superior court and upon proof that the discharge was caused in whole or in part by an act or omission of the third party, to the extent that the discharge is caused by the act or omission of the third party, in accordance with the principles of comparative fault.

(j) Remedies under this section are in addition to, and do not supersede or limit, any and all other remedies, civil or criminal, except that no liability shall be recoverable under subdivision (b) for any discharge for which liability is recovered under Section 13385.

(k) Notwithstanding any other law, all funds generated by the imposition of liabilities pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Waste Discharge Permit Fund. These moneys shall be separately accounted for, and shall be expended by the state board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to assist regional boards, and other public agencies with authority to clean up waste or abate the effects of the waste, in cleaning up or abating the effects of the waste on waters of the state, or for the purposes authorized in Section 13443, or to assist in implementing Chapter 7.3 (commencing with Section 13560).

(l) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 185) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 186.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13351.

In determining the amount of civil liability to be imposed pursuant to this chapter, the superior court shall take into consideration the nature, circumstance, extent, and gravity of the violation or violations, whether the discharge is susceptible to cleanup or abatement, the degree of toxicity of the discharge, and, with respect to the violator, the ability to pay, the effect on ability to continue in business, any voluntary cleanup efforts undertaken, any prior history of violations, the degree of culpability, economic benefit or savings, if any, resulting from the violation, and such other matters as justice may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 869, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. General Provisions Relating to Enforcement and Review [13360. - 13362.]

13360.

(a) No waste discharge requirement or other order of a regional board or the state board or decree of a court issued under this division shall specify the design, location, type of construction, or particular manner in which compliance may be had with that requirement, order, or decree, and the person so ordered shall be permitted to comply with the order in any lawful manner. However, the restrictions of this section shall not apply to waste discharge requirements or orders or decrees with respect to any of the following:

(1) Discharge of solid waste to disposal sites other than evaporation ponds from which there is no drainage or seepage which requires the installation of riprap, the construction of walls and dikes, the installation of surface and underground drainage facilities to prevent runoff from entering the disposal area or leakage to underground or surface waters, or other reasonable requirements to achieve the above or similar purposes.

(2) Discharges of waste or fluid to an injection well, except any well which is regulated by the Division of Oil and Gas in the Department of Conservation pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 3000) of the Public Resources Code and Subpart F of Part 147 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations and is in compliance with that division and Subpart A (commencing with Section 146.1) of Subchapter D of Chapter 1 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) If the court, in an action for an injunction brought under this division, finds that the enforcement of an injunction restraining the discharger from discharging waste would be impracticable, the court may issue any order reasonable under the circumstances requiring specific measures to be undertaken by the discharger to comply with the discharge requirements, order, or decree.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1013, Sec. 9.   Effective September 23, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

13361.

(a) Every civil action brought under the provisions of this division at the request of a regional board or the state board shall be brought by the Attorney General in the name of the people of the State of California and any of those actions relating to the same discharge may be joined or consolidated.

(b) Any civil action brought pursuant to this division shall be brought in a county in which the discharge is made, or proposed to be made. However, any action by or against a city, city and county, county, or other public agency shall, upon motion of either party, be transferred to a county or city and county not a party to the action or to a county or
 city and county other than that in which the city or public agency is located.

(c) In any civil action brought pursuant to this division in which a regional board or the state board seeks a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction, it shall not be necessary to allege or prove at any stage of the proceeding that irreparable damage will occur should the temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction not be issued, or that the remedy at law is inadequate, and the temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction shall issue without those allegations and proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 523, Sec. 4.   (AB 2446)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13362.

A publicly owned treatment works (POTW) with an approved pretreatment program may conduct inspections in accordance with the provisions of Sections 403.8(f)(1)(v) and 403.8(f)(2)(v) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations and assess and collect civil penalties and civil administrative penalties in accordance with Sections 54740, 54740.5, and 54740.6 of the Government Code, with regard to all dischargers of industrial waste to the POTW.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 92, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.   See the prevailing Section 13362 added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 92, with the same substantive provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13362.

(a) A publicly owned treatment works (POTW) with an approved pretreatment program may conduct inspections in accordance with the provisions of Sections 403.8(f)(1)(v) and 403.8(f)(2)(v) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations and assess and collect civil penalties and civil administrative penalties in accordance with Sections 54740, 54740.5, and 54740.6 of the Government Code, with regard to all dischargers of industrial waste to the POTW.

(b) This section prevails over Section 13362, as added to the Water Code by Assembly Bill 1104 of the 1999–2000 Regular Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 93, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Hazardous Substance Removal and Remedial Action Charges [13365. - 13365.]

13365.

(a) (1) For purposes of this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “agency” means the state board or a regional board.

(2) The terms used in this article shall have the same meaning as the definitions specified in the statutory authority under which the agency takes any action subject to this article, except that, notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 78075 of the Health and Safety Code, for purposes of this article, “hazardous substance” includes a hazardous substance specified in subdivision (h) of Section 25281 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) On or before July 1, 1997, the agency shall adopt a billing system for the
 agency’s cost recovery of investigation, analysis, planning, implementation, oversight, or other activity related to the removal or remedial or corrective action of a release of a hazardous substance that includes both of the following:

(1) Billing rates and overhead rates by employee job classification.

(2) Standardized description of work tasks.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after July 1, 1997, any charge imposed upon a responsible party by the agency, to compensate the agency for some, or all, of its costs incurred in connection with the agency’s investigation, analysis, planning, implementation, oversight, or other activity related to a removal or remedial action or a corrective action to a release of a hazardous substance, shall not be assessed or collected unless all of the following
 requirements are met:

(1) Except as provided in subdivision (f), prior to commencing the work or service for which the charge is assessed, and at least annually thereafter if the work or service is continuing, the agency shall provide all of the following information to the responsible party:

(A) A detailed estimate of the work to be performed or services to be provided, including a statement of the expected outcome of that work, based upon data available to the agency at the time.

(B) The billing rates for all individuals and classes of employees expected to engage in the work or service.

(C) An estimate of all expected charges to be billed to the responsible party by the agency, including, but not limited to, any overhead assessments that the agency
 may be authorized to levy.

(2) (A) Invoices shall be issued not less than semiannually with appropriate incentives for prompt payment.

(B) Invoices shall be mailed to the correct person or persons for the responsible party or parties.

(C) Invoices shall provide a daily detail of work performed and time spent by each employee and contractor employee using the billing and overhead rates and the standardized description of work tasks adopted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(D) Invoices shall include the source and amount of all other charges.

(E) Invoices shall be supplemented with statements of any changes in rates and a justification for any changes.

(F) Invoices shall be reviewed for accuracy and appropriateness.

(3) Upon request and within a reasonable time, not to exceed 30 working days from the date of receipt of a request, the agency shall provide the responsible party with copies of time records and other materials supporting the invoice described in paragraph (2). No fees or charges may be assessed for the preparation and delivery of those copies pursuant to this section.

(4) The agency shall identify a party who is responsible for resolving disputes regarding the charges subject to this section and who is not responsible for, or performing, the work or service for which the charges are assessed.

(d) The agency may adjust the scope of the work or service, type of studies, or other tasks to be
 performed, based upon analyses necessary to accommodate new information regarding the extent of contamination of the site, and only after providing written notice of the change to the responsible party containing the information specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(e) The agency may increase billing rates not more than once each calendar year, to the extent authorized by law. Any increase in billing rates or other charges, including, but not limited to, overhead charges, shall operate prospectively only, and shall take effect not sooner than 10 days from the date that written notice has been provided to the responsible party.

(f) (1) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall not apply when a situation exists that requires prompt action to protect human health or safety or the environment.

(2) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) does not apply with respect to those responsible parties who are not identified until after the beginning of a removal or remedial action or corrective action to a release of a hazardous substance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 127.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.2. Preproduction Plastic Debris Program [13367. - 13367.]

13367.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “preproduction plastic” includes plastic resin pellets and powdered coloring for plastics.

(b) (1) The state board and the regional boards shall implement a program to control discharges of preproduction plastic from point and nonpoint sources. The state board shall determine the appropriate regulatory methods to address the discharges from these point and nonpoint sources.

(2) The state board, when developing this program, shall consult with any regional board with plastic manufacturing, handling, and transportation facilities located within the regional board’s jurisdiction that has already voluntarily implemented a program to control discharges of preproduction plastic.

(c) The program control measures shall, at a minimum, include waste discharge, monitoring, and reporting requirements that target plastic manufacturing, handling, and transportation facilities.

(d) The program shall, at a minimum, require plastic manufacturing, handling, and transportation facilities to implement best management practices to control discharges of preproduction plastics. A facility that handles preproduction plastic shall comply with either subdivision (e) or the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (f).

(e) At a minimum, the state board shall require the following best management practices in all permits issued under the national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) program that regulate plastic manufacturing, handling, or transportation facilities:

(1) Appropriate containment systems shall be installed at all onsite storm drain discharge locations that are down-gradient of areas where preproduction plastic is present or transferred. A facility shall install a containment system that is defined as a device or series of devices that traps all particles retained by a one millimeter mesh screen and has a design treatment capacity of not less than the peak flowrate resulting from a one-year, one-hour storm in each of the down-gradient drainage areas. When the installation of a containment system is not appropriate because one or more of a facility’s down-gradient drainage areas is not discharged through a stormwater conveyance system, or when the regional board determines that a one millimeter or similar mesh screen is not appropriate at one or more down-gradient discharge locations, the regulated facility shall identify and propose for approval by the regional board technically feasible alternative storm drain control measures that are designed to achieve the same performance as a one millimeter mesh screen.

(2) At all points of preproduction plastic transfer, measures shall be taken to prevent discharge, including, but not limited to, sealed containers durable enough so as not to rupture under typical loading and unloading activities.

(3) At all points of preproduction plastic storage, preproduction plastic shall be stored in sealed containers that are durable enough so as not to rupture under typical loading and unloading activities.

(4) At all points of storage and transfer of preproduction plastic, capture devices shall be in place under all transfer valves and devices used in loading, unloading, or other transfer of preproduction plastic.

(5) A facility shall make available to its employees a vacuum or vacuum type system, for quick cleanup of fugitive preproduction plastic.

(f) The state board shall include criteria for submitting a no exposure certification pursuant to Section 122.26(g) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations in all NPDES permits regulating plastic manufacturing, handling, or transportation facilities. Facilities that satisfy the no exposure certification criteria are conditionally exempt from the permitting requirements pursuant to Section 122.26 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The no exposure certification shall be required every five years or more frequently as determined by the state board or a regional board.

(g) The state board and the regional boards shall implement this chapter by January 1, 2009.

(h) Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of the state board or the regional boards to establish requirements in addition to the best management practices for the elimination of discharges of preproduction plastic.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 735, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.4. Nonpoint Source Pollution Control Program [13369. - 13369.]

13369.

(a) The state board, in consultation with the regional boards, the California Coastal Commission, and other appropriate state agencies and advisory groups, as necessary, shall prepare a detailed program for the purpose of implementing the state’s nonpoint source management plan. The board shall address all applicable provisions of the Clean Water Act, including Section 319 (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1329), as well as Section 6217 of the federal Coastal Zone Act Reauthorization Amendments of 1990 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1455b), and this division in the preparation of this detailed implementation program.

(b) (1) The program shall include all of the following components:

(A) Nonregulatory implementation of best management practices.

(B) Regulatory-based incentives for best management practices.

(C) The adoption and enforcement of waste discharge requirements that will require the implementation of best management practices.

(2) In connection with its duties under this subdivision to prepare and implement the state’s nonpoint source management plan, the state board shall develop, on or before February 1, 2001, guidance to be used by the state board and the regional boards for the purpose of describing the process by which the state board and the regional boards will enforce the state’s nonpoint source management plan, pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 182.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.5. Compliance With the Provisions of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act as Amended in 1972 [13370. - 13389.]

13370.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) The Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), as amended, provides for permit systems to regulate the discharge of pollutants and dredged or fill material to the navigable waters of the United States and to regulate the use and disposal of sewage sludge.

(b) The Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, provides that permits may be issued by states which are authorized to implement the provisions of that act.

(c) It is in the interest of the people of the state, in order to avoid direct regulation by the federal government of persons already subject to regulation under state law pursuant to this division, to enact this chapter in order to authorize the state to implement the provisions of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, and federal regulations and guidelines issued pursuant thereto, provided, that the state board shall request federal funding under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act for the purpose of carrying out its responsibilities under this program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1189, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13370.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that, since the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), as amended, and applicable federal regulations (40 C.F.R. 403 et seq.) provide for a pretreatment program to regulate the discharge of pollutants into publicly owned treatment works and provide that states with approved national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit programs shall apply for approval of a state pretreatment program, it is in the interest of the people of the state to enact this section in order to avoid direct regulation by the federal government of publicly owned treatment works already subject to regulation under state law pursuant to this division.

(b) The state board shall develop a state pretreatment program and shall, not later than September 1, 1985, apply to the Environmental Protection Agency for approval of the pretreatment program in accordance with federal requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1542, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13371.

(a) In response to an invasive species threat, including, but not limited to, the threat of golden mussels, the state and regional boards shall work with state and local agencies in order to quickly and efficiently respond to the threat. The state board shall identify any tools available to assist a state or local agency in rapidly responding to the invasive species threat.

(b) The state board shall help identify any existing processes that allow for the rapid use of any tool that could be used to address the invasive species threat and enables a streamlined or faster administrative or procedural process.

 (c) The state board, shall, if necessary, help coordinate efforts between the regional boards in response to a threat of an invasive species.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.   (AB 2032)   Effective September 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13372.

(a) This chapter shall be construed to ensure consistency with the requirements for state programs implementing the Federal Water Pollution Control Act and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto. To the extent other provisions of this division are consistent with the provisions of this chapter and with the requirements for state programs implementing the Federal Water Pollution Control Act and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, those provisions apply to actions and procedures provided for in this chapter. The provisions of this chapter shall prevail over other provisions of this division to the extent of any inconsistency. The provisions of this chapter apply only to actions required under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto.

(b) The provisions of Section 13376 requiring the filing of a report for the discharge of dredged or fill material and the provisions of this chapter relating to the issuance of dredged or fill material permits by the state board or a regional board shall be applicable only to discharges for which the state has an approved permit program, in accordance with the provisions of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, for the discharge of dredged or fill material.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 683, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

13373.

The terms “navigable waters,” “administrator,” “pollutants,” “biological monitoring,” “discharge” and “point sources” as used in this chapter shall have the same meaning as in the Federal Water Pollution Control Act and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1189, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

13374.

The term “waste discharge requirements” as referred to in this division is the equivalent of the term “permits” as used in the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1256.)
-------------------------------------------

13375.

The discharge of any radiological, chemical, or biological warfare agent into the waters of the state is hereby prohibited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1256.)
-------------------------------------------

13376.

A person who discharges pollutants or proposes to discharge pollutants to the navigable waters of the United States within the jurisdiction of this state or a person who discharges dredged or fill material or proposes to discharge dredged or fill material into the navigable waters of the United States within the jurisdiction of this state shall file a report of the discharge in compliance with the procedures set forth in Section 13260. Unless required by the state board or a regional board, a report need not be filed under this section for discharges that are not subject to the permit application requirements of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended. A person who proposes to discharge pollutants or dredged or fill material or to operate a publicly owned
 treatment works or other treatment works treating domestic sewage shall file a report at least 180 days in advance of the date on which it is desired to commence the discharge of pollutants or dredged or fill material or the operation of the treatment works. A person who owns or operates a publicly owned treatment works or other treatment works treating domestic sewage, which treatment works commenced operation before January 1, 1988, and does not discharge to navigable waters of the United States, shall file a report within 45 days of a written request by a regional board or the state board, or within 45 days after the state has an approved permit program for the use and disposal of sewage sludge, whichever occurs earlier. The discharge of pollutants or dredged or fill material or the operation of a publicly owned treatment works or other treatment works treating domestic sewage by any person, except as authorized by waste discharge requirements or dredged or fill material permits, is prohibited. This
 prohibition does not apply to discharges or operations if a state or federal permit is not required under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 32.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13377.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the state board or the regional boards shall, as required or authorized by the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, issue waste discharge requirements and dredged or fill material permits which apply and ensure compliance with all applicable provisions of the act and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary, thereto, together with any more stringent effluent standards or limitations necessary to implement water quality control plans, or for the protection of beneficial uses, or to prevent nuisance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

13378.

Waste discharge requirements and dredged or fill material permits shall be adopted only after notice and any necessary hearing. Such requirements or permits shall be adopted for a fixed term not to exceed five years for any proposed discharge, existing discharge, or any material change therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

13380.

Any waste discharge requirements or dredged or fill material permits adopted under this chapter shall be reviewed at least every five years and, if appropriate, revised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

13381.

Waste discharge requirements or dredged or fill material permits may be terminated or modified for cause, including, but not limited to, all of the following:
